Wisconsin, session 2025, SB556.
do enact as follows:SB556,11Section 1. 79.005 (1j) of the statutes is created to read:SB556,2,3279.005 (1j) (a) “Energy storage facility” means property to which all of the 3following apply:SB556,2,441. The property is interconnected to the electrical grid.SB556,2,752. The property is designed to receive electrical energy, to store the electrical 6energy as another form of energy, and to convert that other form back into electrical 7energy.SB556,2,1083. The property delivers the electrical energy converted from some other form, 9as described in subd. 2., for sale or to use for providing reliability or economic 10benefits to the electrical grid.SB556,3,2114. The property is owned by a light, heat, and power company assessed under 12s. 76.28 (2) or 76.29 (2), not including property described in s. 66.0813 unless the 13property is owned or operated by a local governmental unit located outside the 1municipality, or by an electric cooperative assessed under ss. 76.07 and 76.48, 2respectively, or by a municipal electric company under s. 66.0825.SB556,3,73(b) “Energy storage facility” includes hydroelectric pumped storage, 4compressed air energy storage, regenerative fuel cells, batteries, superconducting 5magnetic energy storage, flywheels, thermal energy storage systems, and hydrogen 6storage, or a combination thereof, or any other similar technologies as determined 7by the federal energy regulatory commission.SB556,28Section 2. 79.005 (1L) of the statutes is created to read:SB556,3,14979.005 (1L) “Liquefied natural gas storage facility” means a liquefied natural 10gas storage facility owned by a light, heat, and power company assessed under s. 1176.28 (2) or 76.29 (2), not including property described in s. 66.0813, unless the 12property is owned or operated by a local governmental unit located outside the 13municipality, by an electric cooperative assessed under ss. 76.07 and 76.48, 14respectively, or by a municipal electric company under s. 66.0825.SB556,315Section 3. 79.04 (4) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB556,3,221679.04 (4) (a) Annually, in addition to the amounts distributed under subs. (1), 17(5), (6), and (7), and (7m), the department of administration shall distribute 18$50,000 to a municipality if spent nuclear fuel is stored within the municipality on 19December 31 of the preceding year. If a spent nuclear fuel storage facility is located 20within one mile of a municipality, that municipality shall receive $10,000 annually 21and the municipality where that storage facility is located shall receive $40,000 22annually.SB556,423Section 4. 79.04 (4) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:SB556,4,72479.04 (4) (b) Annually, in addition to the amounts distributed under subs. (2), 1(5), (6), and (7), and (7m), the department of administration shall distribute 2$50,000 to a county if spent nuclear fuel is stored within the county on December 31 3of the preceding year. If a spent nuclear fuel storage facility is located at a 4production plant located in more than one county, the payment shall be apportioned 5according to the formula under sub. (1) (c) 2., except that the formula, as it applies 6to municipalities in that subdivision, applies to counties in this paragraph. The 7payment under this paragraph may not be less than $10,000 annually.SB556,58Section 5. 79.04 (7m) of the statutes is created to read:SB556,4,21979.04 (7m) (a) Annually, the department of administration, upon certification 10by the department of revenue, shall distribute a payment from the public utility 11account to each municipality and county in which an energy storage facility with a 12name-plate capacity of at least one megawatt is located. If the energy storage 13facility is located in a city or village, the city or village receives a payment equal to 14two-thirds of the product of the facility’s name-plate capacity multiplied by $2,000, 15and the county in which the energy storage facility is located receives a payment 16equal to one-third of the product of the facility’s name-plate capacity multiplied by 17$2,000. If the energy storage facility is located in a town, the town receives a 18payment equal to one-third of the product of the facility’s name-plate capacity 19multiplied by $2,000, and the county in which the energy storage facility is located 20receives a payment equal to two-thirds of the product of the facility’s name-plate 21capacity multiplied by $2,000.SB556,5,1322(b) Annually, the department of administration, upon certification by the 23department of revenue, shall distribute a payment from the public utility account to 24each municipality and county in which a liquefied natural gas storage facility is 1located. If the liquefied natural gas storage facility is located in a city or village, the 2city or village receives a payment equal to 6 mills multiplied by the net book value 3of all liquefied natural gas storage facility property within the city or village, as 4determined by the department of revenue, on December 31 of the preceding year, 5and the county in which the liquefied natural gas storage facility is located receives 6a payment equal to 3 mills multiplied by the same net book value of the liquefied 7natural gas storage facility property. If the liquefied natural gas storage facility is 8located in a town, the town receives a payment equal to 3 mills multiplied by the net 9book value of all liquefied natural gas storage facility property within the town, as 10determined by the department of revenue, on December 31 of the preceding year, 11and the county in which the liquefied natural gas storage facility is located receives 12a payment equal to 6 mills multiplied by the same net book value of the liquefied 13natural gas storage facility property.SB556,614Section 6. 79.04 (8) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:SB556,5,201579.04 (8) (intro.) All of the following apply to the payments for property of a 16production plant, energy storage facility, or liquefied natural gas storage facility 17that includes multiple power generation or storage units, except that this 18subsection applies only if the production plant’s, energy storage facility’s, or 19liquefied natural gas storage facility’s first power generation or storage unit 20permanently ceases generating electricity after March 23, 2024:SB556,721Section 7. 79.04 (8) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB556,6,42279.04 (8) (a) No payment received by a municipality or county under sub. (1), 23(2), (6), or (7), or (7m) shall be reduced on the basis that one or more, but not all, of 24the power generation or storage units permanently cease generating electricity or 1storing energy or natural gas, and the amount of the payment shall be the amount 2that the municipality or county received in the year before the year in which the 3first power generation or storage unit permanently ceased generating electricity or 4storing energy or natural gas.SB556,85Section 8. 79.04 (8) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:SB556,6,12679.04 (8) (b) The payments under sub. (5) (a) or (b) shall not be made until the 7production plant, energy storage facility, or liquefied natural gas storage facility is 8decommissioned, and then the payments shall be determined on the basis of the 9amount of the payment received by the municipality or county under sub. (1), (2), 10(6), or (7), or (7m) in the year before the year in which the first power generation or 11storage unit permanently ceased generating electricity or storing energy or natural 12gas.SB556,913Section 9. Initial applicability.SB556,6,1414(1) This act first applies to distributions made after January 1, 2027.SB556,6,1515